District of Columbia statutes.
50-1301.84

Provisions of chapter not to prevent other processes provided by law.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as preventing the plaintiff in any action at law from relying for relief upon the other processes provided by law.

May 25, 1954, 68 Stat. 140, ch. 222, § 84
1981 Ed., § 40-481.
1973 Ed., § 40-497.